Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,118
Department of Revenue; charge for information; authorized.

(1) The Department of Revenue may charge persons and state agencies for any listings made by the department of information that is not confidential. The Tax Commissioner shall set the price of such listings which shall be the cost of production.

(2) The Department of Revenue shall remit all funds received under this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 21.
July 1, 2026